Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4121
DNA testing; costs.

The cost of DNA testing ordered under subsection (5) of section 29-4120 shall be paid by the person filing the motion, unless the court determines such person to be indigent. If the person filing such motion is determined by the court to be indigent, the costs shall be paid by the state in the following manner:

(1) If the Commission on Public Advocacy has been appointed to represent the person filing the motion, as determined under section 29-4122, the costs of testing shall be paid by the commission from funds appropriated by the Legislature; and

(2) If the Commission on Public Advocacy has not been appointed to represent the person filing the motion, the court shall hold a hearing to determine the costs for DNA testing. The court shall order the commission to pay such costs. The order shall be forwarded by the clerk of the court to the commission, along with copies of all invoices for such DNA testing. Upon receipt, the commission shall pay such costs from funds appropriated by the Legislature.

Laws 2001, LB 659, § 6;

Laws 2002, LB 876, § 70.

Commission on Public Advocacy, see the County Revenue Assistance Act, section 29-3919.